Washington statutes.
RCW 18.380.040

Applied behavior analysis advisory committee.

(1) The Washington state applied behavior analysis advisory committee is established.

(2) The committee consists of the following five members:

(a) Three members who are licensed behavior analysts or, for the initial members of the committee, certified by the national behavior analyst certification board as either a board certified behavior analyst or a board certified behavior analyst - doctoral;

(b) One member who is a licensed assistant behavior analyst or, for the initial members of the committee, certified by the national behavior analyst certification board as a board certified assistant behavior analyst; and

(c) One member of the public who is not a member of any other health care licensing board or commission and does not have a material or financial interest in the rendering of services regulated under this chapter. The public member may be the parent or guardian of a recipient of behavior analysis services.

(3) The secretary shall appoint the committee members. Committee members serve at the pleasure of the secretary. The secretary may appoint members of the initial committee to staggered terms of one to four years, and thereafter all terms are for four years. No member may serve more than two consecutive terms.

(4) It is recommended that one of the three licensed behavior analysts appointed to the committee also has an additional mental health license, such as a psychologist.

(5) The committee shall elect officers each year. The committee shall meet at least twice each year and may hold additional meetings as called by the chair. A majority of the committee appointed and serving constitutes a quorum.

(6) The secretary shall consult with the committee in determining the qualifications for licensure or certification under RCW 18.380.050.

(7) Committee members must be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240. Members must be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the actual performance of their duties, as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 2015 c 118 s 4.]